Idaho, session 2025, S1099.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-4007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4007. PUNISHMENT FOR MANSLAUGHTER. Manslaughter is punishable as
follows:
(1) Voluntary -- by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000), or by a sentence to the custody of the state board of correction
not exceeding fifteen (15) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) Involuntary -- by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), or by a sentence to the custody of the state board of correction
not exceeding ten (10) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(3) Vehicular -- in the operation of a motor vehicle:
(a) For a violation of section 18-4006(3)(a), Idaho Code, by a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by a sentence to the
custody of the state board of correction not exceeding ten (10) years,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(b) For a violation of section 18-4006(3)(b), Idaho Code,:
(i) For a person who has not previously been found guilty of or
pled guilty to a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004
or 18-8006, Idaho Code, or any substantially conforming for-
eign criminal violation, as described in section 18-8005(10),
Idaho Code, by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000), or by a sentence to the custody of the state board of
correction not exceeding fifteen (15) years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
(ii) For a person who has previously been found guilty of or pled
guilty once to a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004
or 18-8006, Idaho Code, or any substantially conforming foreign
criminal violation, as described in section 18-8005(10), Idaho
Code, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judg-
ment, by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)
and by a sentence to the custody of the state board of correction


for a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of five (5)
years, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.
(iii) For a person who has previously been found guilty of or
pled guilty two (2) or more times to a violation of the provisions
of section 18-8004 or 18-8006, Idaho Code, or any substantially
conforming foreign criminal violation, as described in section
18-8005(10), Idaho Code, notwithstanding the form of the judgment
or withheld judgment, by a fine of not more than twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) and by a sentence to the custody of the state
board of correction for a mandatory minimum fixed term of impris-
onment of ten (10) years, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.
(c) For a violation of section 18-4006(3)(c), Idaho Code, by a fine of
not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by a jail sentence not
exceeding one (1) year, or by both such fine and jail sentence.
(d) In addition to the foregoing, any person convicted of a violation
of section 18-4006(3), Idaho Code, which that resulted in the death of
the parent or parents of minor children may be ordered by the court to
pay support for each such minor child until the child reaches the age of
eighteen (18) years. In setting the amount of support, the court shall
consider all relevant factors. The nonpayment of such support shall
be subject to enforcement and collection by the surviving parent or
guardian of the child in the same manner that other child support orders
are enforced as provided by law. In no event shall the child support
judgment or order imposed by the court under this section be paid or in-
demnified by the proceeds of any liability insurance policy.
(e) In addition to the foregoing, the driver's license of any person
convicted of a violation of section 18-4006(3), Idaho Code, may be sus-
pended for a time determined by the court.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-8005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8005. PENALTIES. (1) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found
guilty of a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a), Idaho
Code, for the first time is guilty of a misdemeanor; and, except as provided
in section 18-8004C, Idaho Code:
(a) May be sentenced to jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months;
(b) May be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(c) Shall be advised by the court in writing at the time of sentencing
of the penalties that will be imposed for subsequent violations of the
provisions of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, which advice shall be signed
by the defendant, and a copy retained by the court and another copy re-
tained by the prosecuting attorney;
(d) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a pe-
riod of thirty (30) days, which shall not be reduced and during which
thirty (30) day period absolutely no driving privileges of any kind may
be granted. After the thirty (30) day period of absolute suspension of
driving privileges has passed, the defendant shall have driving privi-
leges suspended by the court for an additional period of at least sixty
(60) days, not to exceed one hundred fifty (150) days, during which
the defendant may request restricted driving privileges that the court


may allow, if the defendant shows by a preponderance of the evidence
that driving privileges are necessary for his employment or for family
health needs; and
(e) Unless an exception is granted pursuant to section 18-8002(12),
Idaho Code, shall within ten (10) days following the end of the period
of absolute suspension have a state-approved ignition interlock system
meeting the requirements of section 18-8008, Idaho Code, installed, at
his expense, on all motor vehicles operated by him for a period to end
one (1) year following the end of the suspension period. A court may
determine that an offender is eligible to utilize available funds from
the court interlock device and electronic monitoring device fund, as
outlined in section 18-8010, Idaho Code, for the installation and oper-
ation of an ignition interlock device, based on evidence of financial
hardship.
(2) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the first time is
guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to:
(a) The provisions of subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) and (e) of this sec-
tion; and
(b) The provisions of section 49-335, Idaho Code.
(3) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(c), Idaho Code, for the first time is
guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to:
(a) The provisions of subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) and (e) of this sec-
tion; and
(b) The provisions of section 49-335, Idaho Code.
(4) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b) or (c), Idaho Code, who previ-
ously has been found guilty of or has pled guilty to a violation of the provi-
sions of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b) or (c), Idaho Code, or any substantially
conforming foreign criminal violation within ten (10) years, notwithstand-
ing the form of the judgment(s) or withheld judgment(s), and except as pro-
vided in section 18-8004C, Idaho Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor; and, ex-
cept as provided in section 18-8004C, Idaho Code:
(a) Shall be sentenced to jail for a mandatory minimum period of no less
than ten (10) days, the first forty-eight (48) hours of which must be
consecutive, and five (5) days of which must be served in jail, as re-
quired by 23 U.S.C. 164, and may be sentenced to no more than one (1)
year, provided however, that in the discretion of the sentencing judge,
the judge may authorize the defendant to be assigned to a work detail
program within the custody of the county sheriff during the period of
incarceration;
(b) May be fined an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000);
(c) Shall be advised by the court in writing at the time of sentencing
of the penalties that will be imposed for subsequent violations of the
provisions of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, which advice shall be signed
by the defendant, and a copy retained by the court and another copy re-
tained by the prosecuting attorney;
(d) Shall surrender his driver's license or permit to the court;


(e) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for an
additional mandatory minimum period of one (1) year after release from
confinement, during which one (1) year period absolutely no driving
privileges of any kind may be granted; and
(f) Shall, while operating a motor vehicle, be required to drive only
a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock system,
as provided in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, following the one (1) year
mandatory license suspension period.
(5) If the person has pled guilty or was found guilty for the sec-
ond time within ten (10) years of a violation of the provisions of section
18-8004(1)(b) or (c), Idaho Code, then the provisions of section 49-335,
Idaho Code, shall apply.
(6) Except as provided in section 18-8004C, Idaho Code, any person who
pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of the provisions of sec-
tion 18-8004(1)(a), (b) or (c), Idaho Code, who previously has been found
guilty of or has pled guilty to two (2) or more violations of the provisions
of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b) or (c), Idaho Code, or any substantially con-
forming foreign criminal violation, or any combination thereof, or who has
completed a diversion program for driving under the influence, whether or
not the person has pled guilty or been found guilty, or any substantially
conforming foreign program, and has pled guilty or been found guilty of one
(1) or more violations of the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b), or
(c), Idaho Code, or any substantially conforming foreign criminal violation
within ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or with-
held judgment(s), shall be guilty of a felony and:
(a) Shall be sentenced to the custody of the state board of correction
for not to exceed ten (10) years; provided that notwithstanding the pro-
visions of section 19-2601, Idaho Code, should the court impose any sen-
tence other than incarceration in the state penitentiary, the defendant
shall be sentenced to the county jail for a mandatory minimum period of
no less than thirty (30) days, the first forty-eight (48) hours of which
must be consecutive, and ten (10) days of which must be served in jail,
as required by 23 U.S.C. 164; and further provided that notwithstanding
the provisions of section 18-111, Idaho Code, a conviction under this
section shall be deemed a felony;
(b) May be fined an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000);
(c) Shall surrender his driver's license or permit to the court;
(d) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a
mandatory minimum period of one (1) year after release from imprison-
ment, during which time he shall have absolutely no driving privileges
of any kind, and may have his driving privileges suspended by the court
for an additional period not to exceed four (4) years, during which
the defendant may request restricted driving privileges that the court
may allow if the defendant shows by a preponderance of the evidence
that driving privileges are necessary for his employment or for family
health needs; and
(e) Shall, while operating a motor vehicle, be required to drive only
a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock system,
as provided in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, following the mandatory one
(1) year license suspension period.


(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (4)(e) and (6)(d)
of this section, any person who is enrolled in and is a participant in good
standing in a drug court or mental health court approved by the supreme
court drug court and mental health court coordinating committee under the
provisions of chapter 56, title 19, Idaho Code, or other similar problem
solving court utilizing community-based sentencing alternatives shall be
eligible for restricted noncommercial driving privileges for the purpose
of getting to and from work, school or an alcohol treatment program, which
may be granted by the presiding judge of the drug court or mental health
court or other similar problem solving court, provided that the offender
has served a period of absolute suspension of driving privileges of at least
forty-five (45) days, that a state-approved ignition interlock system is
installed, at his expense, on any motor vehicles operated by the offender
for a period to end one (1) year following the end of the suspension period
and that the offender has shown proof of financial responsibility as defined
and in the amounts specified in section 49-117, Idaho Code, provided that
the restricted noncommercial driving privileges may be continued if the of-
fender successfully completes the drug court, mental health court or other
similar problem solving court, and that the court may revoke such privileges
for failure to comply with the terms of probation or with the terms and condi-
tions of the drug court, mental health court or other similar problem solving
court program.
(8) For the purpose of computation of the enhancement period in subsec-
tions (4), (6) and (9) of this section, the time that elapses between the date
of commission of the offense and the date the defendant pleads guilty or is
found guilty for the pending offense shall be excluded. If the determination
of guilt against the defendant is reversed upon appeal, the time that elapsed
between the date of the commission of the offense and the date the defendant
pleads guilty or is found guilty following the appeal shall also be excluded.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (4) and (6) of this
section, any person who has pled guilty to or has been found guilty of a
felony violation of the provisions of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, a felony
violation of the provisions of section 18-8004C, Idaho Code, a violation
of the provisions of section 18-8006, Idaho Code, a violation of the provi-
sions of section 18-4006 3.(b), Idaho Code, notwithstanding the form of the
judgment(s) or withheld judgment(s) or any substantially conforming foreign
criminal felony violation, notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or
withheld judgment(s), and within fifteen (15) years pleads guilty to or is
found guilty of a further violation of the provisions of section 18-8004,
Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section.
(10) For the purpose of subsections (4), (6) and (9) of this section and
the provisions of section 18-8004C, Idaho Code, a substantially conforming
foreign criminal violation exists when a person has pled guilty to or has
been found guilty of a violation of any federal law or law of another state,
or any valid county, city, or town ordinance of another state substantially
conforming to the provisions of section 18-8004, Idaho Code. The determina-
tion of whether a foreign criminal violation is substantially conforming is
a question of law to be determined by the court.


(11) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
the provisions of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code, shall
undergo, at his own expense (or at county expense through the procedures set
forth in chapters 34 and 35, title 31, Idaho Code) and prior to the sentencing
date, an alcohol evaluation by a substance use disorders service provider
approved by the Idaho department of health and welfare; provided however, if
the defendant has no prior or pending charges with respect to the provisions
of section 18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code, and the court has the
records and information required under subsection (12)(a), (b) and (c) of
this section or possesses information from other reliable sources relating
to the defendant's use or nonuse of alcohol or drugs that does not give the
court any reason to believe that the defendant regularly abuses alcohol or
drugs and is in need of treatment, the court may, in its discretion, waive the
evaluation with respect to sentencing for a violation of section 18-8004 or
18-8004C(1), Idaho Code, and proceed to sentence the defendant. The court
may also, in its discretion, waive the requirement of an alcohol evaluation
with respect to a defendant's first violation of the provisions of section
18-8004, 18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code, and proceed to sentence the de-
fendant if the court has a presentence investigation report, substance use
disorder assessment, criminogenic risk assessment, or other assessment
that evaluates the defendant's degree of alcohol abuse and need for alcohol
treatment conducted within twelve (12) months preceding the date of the
defendant's sentencing. In the event an alcohol evaluation indicates the
need for alcohol treatment, the evaluation shall contain a recommendation
by the evaluator as to the most appropriate treatment program, together with
the estimated cost thereof, and recommendations for other suitable alter-
native treatment programs, together with the estimated costs thereof. The
person shall request that a copy of the completed evaluation be forwarded
to the court. The court shall take the evaluation into consideration in
determining an appropriate sentence. If a copy of the completed evaluation
has not been provided to the court, the court may proceed to sentence the
defendant; however, in such event, it shall be presumed that alcohol treat-
ment is required unless the defendant makes a showing by a preponderance of
evidence that treatment is not required. If the defendant has not made a good
faith effort to provide the completed copy of the evaluation to the court,
the court may consider the failure of the defendant to provide the report
as an aggravating circumstance in determining an appropriate sentence. If
treatment is ordered, in no event shall the person or facility doing the
evaluation be the person or facility that provides the treatment unless this
requirement is waived by the sentencing court, with the exception of fed-
erally recognized Indian tribes or federal military installations, where
diagnosis and treatment are appropriate and available. Nothing herein con-
tained shall preclude the use of funds authorized pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 3, title 39, Idaho Code, for court-ordered alcohol treatment for
indigent defendants.
(12) At the time of sentencing, the court shall be provided with the fol-
lowing information:
(a) The results, if administered, of any evidentiary test for alcohol
and/or drugs;


(b) A computer or teletype or other acceptable copy of the person's
driving record;
(c) Information as to whether the defendant has pled guilty to or
been found guilty of a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004,
18-8004C or 18-8006, Idaho Code, or a similar offense within the past
five (5) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or withheld
judgment(s); and
(d) The alcohol evaluation required in subsection (11) of this section,
if any.
(13) At the time of sentencing, the court shall inform the defendant
that a second or subsequent offense of driving while under the influence of
alcohol, drugs, or any other intoxicating substances that results in death
may be considered vehicular manslaughter and may result in stricter pun-
ishment, including a mandatory fixed term of imprisonment of at least five
(5) years for a second offense and a mandatory fixed term of imprisonment
of at least ten (10) years for a third or subsequent offense, as provided in
section 18-4007(3)(b)(ii) and (iii), Idaho Code. Failure by the court to
inform the defendant of such information shall not prohibit the imposition
of a mandatory fixed term of imprisonment, and proof of knowledge of the
mandatory fixed term of imprisonment shall not be required for such term to
be imposed.
(13) (14) A minor may be prosecuted for a violation of the provisions of
section 18-8004 or 18-8004C, Idaho Code, under chapter 5, title 20, Idaho
Code. In addition to any other penalty, if a minor pleads guilty to or is
found guilty of a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a),
(b) or (c) or 18-8004C, Idaho Code, he shall have his driving privileges
suspended or denied for an additional one (1) year following the end of any
period of suspension or revocation existing at the time of the violation,
or until he reaches the age of twenty-one (21) years, whichever period is
greater. During the period of additional suspension or denial, absolutely
no driving privileges shall be allowed.
(14) (15) In the event that the alcohol evaluation required in subsec-
tion (11) of this section recommends alcohol treatment, the court shall
order the person to complete a treatment program in addition to any other
sentence that may be imposed, unless the court determines that alcohol
treatment would be inappropriate or undesirable, in which event the court
shall enter findings articulating the reasons for such determination on
the record. The court shall order the defendant to complete the preferred
treatment program set forth in the evaluation, or a comparable alternative,
unless it appears that the defendant cannot reasonably obtain adequate fi-
nancial resources for such treatment. In that event, the court may order
the defendant to complete a less costly alternative set forth in the evalua-
tion, or a comparable program. Such treatment shall, to the greatest extent
possible, be at the expense of the defendant. In the event that funding is
provided for or on behalf of the defendant by an entity of state government,
restitution shall be ordered to such governmental entity in accordance with
the restitution procedure for crime victims, as specified under chapter
53, title 19, Idaho Code. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as
requiring a court to order that a governmental entity shall provide alcohol
treatment at government expense unless otherwise required by law.


(15) (16) Any person who is disqualified, or whose driving privileges
have been suspended, revoked or canceled under the provisions of this chap-
ter, shall not be granted restricted driving privileges to operate a commer-
cial motor vehicle.
(16) (17) As used in this section, "at his expense" includes the cost of
obtaining, installing, using and maintaining an ignition interlock system.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-8006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8006. AGGRAVATED DRIVING WHILE UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL,
DRUGS OR ANY OTHER INTOXICATING SUBSTANCES. (1) Any person causing great
bodily harm, permanent disability or permanent disfigurement to any person
other than himself in committing a violation of the provisions of section
18-8004(1)(a) or (1)(c), Idaho Code, is guilty of a felony, and upon convic-
tion:
(a) Shall be sentenced to the state board of correction for not to ex-
ceed fifteen (15) years, provided that notwithstanding the provisions
of section 19-2601, Idaho Code, should the court impose any sentence
other than incarceration in the state penitentiary, the defendant shall
be sentenced to the county jail for a mandatory minimum period of not
less than thirty (30) days, the first forty-eight (48) hours of which
must be consecutive; and further provided that notwithstanding the pro-
visions of section 18-111, Idaho Code, a conviction under this section
shall be deemed a felony;
(b) May be fined an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000);
(c) Shall surrender his driver's license or permit to the court; and
(d) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a
mandatory minimum period of one (1) year after release from imprison-
ment, and may have his driving privileges suspended by the court for not
to exceed five (5) years after release from imprisonment, during which
time he shall have absolutely no driving privileges of any kind; and
(e) Shall be ordered by the court to pay restitution in accordance with
chapter 53, title 19, Idaho Code.
(2) At the time of sentencing, the court shall inform the defendant that
a second or subsequent offense of driving while under the influence of alco-
hol, drugs, or any other intoxicating substances that results in death may
be considered vehicular manslaughter and may result in stricter punishment,
including a mandatory fixed term of imprisonment of at least five (5) years
for a second offense and a mandatory fixed term of imprisonment of at least
ten (10) years for a third or subsequent offense, as provided in section
18-4007(3)(b)(ii) and (iii), Idaho Code. Failure by the court to inform the
defendant of such information shall not prohibit the imposition of a manda-
tory fixed term of imprisonment, and proof of knowledge of the mandatory
fixed term of imprisonment shall not be required for such term to be imposed.
(2) (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any evidence of
conviction under this section shall be admissible in any civil action for
damages resulting from the occurrence. A conviction for the purposes of
this section means that the person has pled guilty or has been found guilty,
notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or withheld judgment(s).


SECTION 4. That Section 18-8004A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8004A. PENALTIES -- PERSONS UNDER 21 WITH LESS THAN 0.08 ALCOHOL
CONCENTRATION. (1) Any person found guilty of a violation of subsection
(1)(d) of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and,
for a first offense:
(a) Shall be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000);
(b) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a pe-
riod of one (1) year, ninety (90) days of which shall not be reduced and
during which period absolutely no driving privileges of any kind may be
granted. After the period of absolute suspension of driving privileges
has passed, the defendant may request restricted driving privileges
which the court may allow, if the defendant shows by a preponderance of
the evidence that driving privileges are necessary as deemed appropri-
ate by the court;
(c) Shall be advised by the court in writing at the time of sentencing of
the penalties that will be imposed for any subsequent violation of the
provisions of this section or any violation of section 18-8004, Idaho
Code, which advice shall be signed by the defendant, and a copy retained
by the court and another copy retained by the prosecuting attorney;
(d) Shall be required to undergo an alcohol evaluation and otherwise
comply with the requirements of section 18-8005(11) and (14) (15),
Idaho Code, as ordered by the court.
(2) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation
of the provisions of subsection (1)(d) of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, who
previously has been found guilty of or has pled guilty to a violation of the
provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b), (c) or (d), Idaho Code, or any
substantially conforming foreign criminal violation, as defined in section
18-8005(10), Idaho Code, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or with-
held judgment, is guilty of a misdemeanor; and:
(a) Shall be sentenced to jail for a mandatory minimum period of five
(5) days, as required by 23 U.S.C. section 164, not to exceed thirty (30)
days;
(b) Shall be fined an amount of not less than five hundred dollars
($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000);
(c) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a pe-
riod not to exceed two (2) years, one (1) year of which shall be absolute
and shall not be reduced and during which period absolutely no driving
privileges of any kind may be granted;
(d) Shall, while operating a motor vehicle, be required to drive only
a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock system,
as provided in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, following the mandatory one
(1) year license suspension period;
(e) Shall be advised by the court in writing at the time of sentencing
of the penalties that will be imposed for subsequent violations of the
provisions of this section or section 18-8004, Idaho Code, which advice
shall be signed by the defendant, and a copy retained by the court and
another copy retained by the prosecuting attorney; and


(f) Shall undergo an alcohol evaluation and comply with the other re-
quirements of subsections (11) and (14) of section 18-8005 (11) and
(15), Idaho Code.
(3) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation
of the provisions of subsection (1)(d) of section 18-8004, Idaho Code, who
previously has been found guilty of or has pled guilty to two (2) or more vi-
olations of the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(a), (b), (c) or (d), Idaho
Code, or any substantially conforming foreign criminal violation, within
five (5) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judg-
ment, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and:
(a) Shall be sentenced to jail for a mandatory minimum period of ten
(10) days, as required by 23 U.S.C. section 164, not to exceed six (6)
months;
(b) Shall be fined an amount of not less than one thousand dollars
($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000);
(c) Shall surrender his driver's license or permit to the court;
(d) Shall have his driving privileges suspended by the court for a
mandatory minimum period of one (1) year, during which period abso-
lutely no driving privileges of any kind may be granted, or until such
person reaches the age of twenty-one (21) years, whichever is greater;
(e) Shall, while operating a motor vehicle, be required to drive only
a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock system,
as provided in section 18-8008, Idaho Code, following the mandatory one
(1) year license suspension period; and
(f) Shall undergo an alcohol evaluation and comply with all other re-
quirements imposed by the court pursuant to section 18-8005(11) and
(14) (15), Idaho Code.
(4) All provisions of section 18-8005, Idaho Code, not otherwise in
conflict with or provided for in this section shall apply to any sentencing
imposed under the provisions of this section.
(5) A person violating the provisions of section 18-8004(1)(d), Idaho
Code, may be prosecuted under title 20, Idaho Code.
(6) Any person whose driving privileges are suspended, revoked, can-
celed or disqualified under the provisions of this chapter shall not be
granted privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle during the period
of suspension, revocation, cancellation or disqualification.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.